District of Columbia statutes.
16-5504

Fees and costs.

(a)

The court may award a moving party who prevails, in whole or in part, on a motion brought under § 16-5502 or § 16-5503 the costs of litigation, including reasonable attorney fees.

(b)

The court may award reasonable attorney fees and costs to the responding party only if the court finds that a motion brought under § 16-5502 or § 16-5503 is frivolous or is solely intended to cause unnecessary delay.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-351, § 5, 58 DCR 741
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 401, 59 DCR 6190
Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this chapter into law.